incubator/apertium-en-sco/apertium-en-sco.sco.dix
    <pardef n="d/ae__vaux">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ae__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aein</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aein</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aein</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" c="mig arreglo raro, revisar">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oud</l>
          <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="will/__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="whit__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="the__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anither__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ither__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="her__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="whit"><i>whit</i><par n="whit__det"/></e>
    <e lm="a" r="LR"><i>a</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="a" r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="the__det"/></e>
    <e lm="anither"><i>anither</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ither"><i>ither</i><par n="ither__det"/></e>
    <e lm="her"><i>her</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
    <e lm="his"><i>his</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
    <e lm="my"><i>my</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dae"><i>d</i><par n="d/ae__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dae"><i>d</i><par n="d/ae__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="can"><i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="will"><i>will</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="sall"><i>sall</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="wad"><i>wad</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="buid"><i>buid</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="mey"><i>mey</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="maun"><i>maun</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="coud"><i>coud</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="micht"><i>micht</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="shoud"><i>shoud</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
